Mississippi, session 2026, HB1742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) Subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated therefor, the Department of Corrections shall provide body-worn cameras to each correctional officer within the department when such officer is in the performance of controlling, directing and monitoring the activities and movements of inmates. The body-worn cameras shall be kept in good working condition, worn on the uniform of any correctional officer while the officer is on duty and shall be fully operational while the officer is in the performance of the duties setout under this subsection. (2)  For purposes of this section, "body-worn camera" means a device that is worn by a law enforcement officer which has the capability of electronically recording audio and video of the activities of the correctional officer. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.